District of Columbia statutes.
7-2404

Proposal for immediate negotiation.

Within 30 days of March 17, 1983, the Mayor shall propose to Congress, the Secretary of Defense, the Secretary of State, and the President the immediate negotiation with the Soviet Union of a permanent, mutual freeze on the testing, production, and further deployment of all nuclear weapons and their delivery systems.

Mar. 17, 1983, D.C. Law 4-210, § 5, 30 DCR 1088

Initiative 37, D.C. Law 10-99: D.C. Law 10-99 was enacted by the electors of the District of Columbia in Initiative Measure 37.

Section 1 of D.C. Law 10-99 requires the Mayor to notify the District’s Congressional Delegate, in writing, that a majority of District voters request that the Delegate propose a Constitutional amendment directing the U.S. government to: 1) abolish all nuclear warheads by the year 2000; 2) pursue a good faith effort to eliminate war, armed conflict, and military operations; 3) actively promote international peace and nuclear disarmament; and 4) convert weapons industries into constructive, ecologically beneficial peacetime industries and to redirect those resources to meet human needs, including housing, health care, agriculture, education, and environment.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-99 provided for severability of the act.

1981 Ed., § 6-1514.
Prisons, privately operated facilities, authority to register firearms, see § 24-261.02.